Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.240

Calculation of certificated instructional staff service years.

Years of service in a charter school by certificated instructional staff shall be included in the years of service calculation for purposes of the statewide salary allocation schedule under RCW 28A.150.410. This section does not require a charter school to pay a particular salary to its staff while the staff is employed by the charter school.

[ 2016 c 241 s 124. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 224 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]